Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 5. Judicial Review.

Sec. 44.62.300.
Judicial review of validity.

An interested person may get a judicial declaration on the validity of a regulation by bringing an action for declaratory relief in the superior court. In addition to any other ground the court may declare the regulation invalid

for a substantial failure to comply with AS

44.62.010

—

44.62.319

; or

in the case of an emergency regulation or order of repeal, upon the ground that the facts recited in the statement do not constitute an emergency under AS

44.62.250

.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a person may not bring an action in court to challenge the adoption, repeal, or amendment of a regulation by a state agency for

insufficiency or inaccuracy of the information provided under AS

44.62.190(d)

or (g);

failure of the subject line of electronic mail or the title of a written publication to meet the requirements of AS

44.62.190(f)

;

failure of the brief description required by AS

44.62.200(d)

to comply with the requirements of AS

44.62.200(d)

relating to

the clarity and readability of the brief description; or

the description of the changes made by the proposed adoption, amendment, or repeal of a regulation; or

inaccuracy or insufficiency of the answer to a question provided by the state agency under AS

44.62.213

.

History.

(§ 1 art V (ch 1) ch 143 SLA 1959; am § 10 ch 87 SLA 2014; am § 16 ch 7 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective October 14, 2014, added (b) and made a related change.

The 2018 amendment, effective August 1, 2018, in (a)(1), substituted “AS

44.62.010

–

44.62.319

” for “AS

44.62.010

–

44.62.320

”.

Editor’s notes. —

Under sec. 12, ch. 87, SLA 2014, subsection (b) applies “to proposed regulations first published under AS

44.62.190

on or after October 14, 2014.”

Sec. 44.62.305.
Judicial relief in administrative matters.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary and except as provided in (f) and (g) of this section, a person may obtain judicial relief in an administrative matter from the superior court before the state agency handling the administrative proceeding on the matter issues a final administrative decision if

the person is a party to the administrative proceeding;

the person has satisfied the procedural requirements of the administrative proceeding up to the time that the person petitions for judicial relief under (b) of this section;

the state agency has unreasonably delayed the progress of the administrative proceeding; and

further delay in reaching a final administrative decision will cause the person immediate and irreparable damage.

A person may seek judicial relief under (a) of this section by filing a petition in the superior court. A person may not file the petition until 30 days after the person has filed with the state agency handling the administrative proceeding a written notice that the person intends to file the petition.

In a proceeding begun under (b) of this section, if the superior court determines that the person is eligible for judicial relief under (a) of this section, the superior court may

enjoin the administrative proceeding and determine the administrative matter in the superior court;

order that the administrative matter be handled by another form of dispute resolution; or

establish a deadline for the state agency to issue a final administrative decision.

After a person files a petition under (b) of this section, the state agency shall continue with the administrative proceeding unless the superior court

enjoins the administrative proceeding under (c)(1) of this section; or

issues an order under (c)(2) of this section.

If the superior court decides that a person is not eligible for judicial relief under (a) of this section, a party to the administrative proceeding may exercise any right of appeal allowed under law for the final administrative decision as if the person had not filed a petition under (b) of this section.

A person may not obtain judicial relief under this section in a personnel proceeding by a state agency. In this subsection, “personnel proceeding” includes a proceeding under AS 39.25 (State Personnel Act) and a proceeding in a grievance arbitration procedure under a collective bargaining agreement.

This section does not apply to an administrative proceeding of a state agency if another statute of this state establishes a deadline for the state agency to make a final decision in the administrative proceeding.

In this section,

“administrative matter” means the subject matter of an administrative proceeding;

“administrative proceeding” means

a proceeding subject to AS

44.62.330

—

44.62.630

; and

a proceeding that is not subject to AS

44.62.330

—

44.62.630

, that is authorized by statute for the adjudication of a state agency matter by the state agency handling the matter or by a person appointed by the state agency, and that involves a matter that directly affects the personal, professional, or business interests of a specific person who is named in the adjudication;

“damage” means damage to the personal, professional, or business interests of a person;

“party” means a specific person whose personal, professional, or business interests are the subject of an administrative proceeding and who is named in the administrative proceeding;

“person” does not include a state agency or other governmental agency;

“state agency” means a department, an institution, a board, a commission, a division, an authority, and any other administrative unit of the executive branch of state government, except a public corporation; the term includes the University of Alaska.

History.

(§ 2 ch 166 SLA 2004)